Hawaii statutes.
PART XV.
DISSOLUTION

A. Voluntary
Dissolution

[§414-381] Dissolution by incorporators or
initial directors. A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of
a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may
dissolve the corporation by delivering to the department director for filing
articles of dissolution that set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date of its incorporation;

(3) Either:

(A) That none of the corporation's shares has
been issued; or

(B) That the corporation has not commenced
business;

(4) That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

(5) That the net assets of the corporation remaining
after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were
issued; and

(6) That a majority of the incorporators or initial
directors authorized the dissolution. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next